Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Community College Districts
§ 21-18-312.
Formation of districts; initial elections.

An application for the formation of a community college district may be submitted to the commission only when the following minimal prerequisites have been satisfied: the area to be formed into the district must be a territory having an assessed property valuation of not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00); there must be not less than fifteen hundred (1,500) students regularly enrolled in grades nine (9) through twelve (12). The territory of such district may encompass one (1) or more counties.

No community college may be established in the state of Wyoming unless approved by the community college commission pursuant to the provisions of this act and approved by the legislature. No state funds for any purpose shall ever be distributed to any community college district which is formed without legislative approval.

The application for the formation of a community college district shall be submitted in the form prescribed by the commission and subscribed by not less than five hundred (500) or twenty-five percent (25%), whichever is the smaller number of qualified electors residing within each of the counties situated in the area sought to be organized into a community college district.

Whenever the community college commission receives a proper application for the formation of a community college district, it shall cause a survey to be conducted to consider the need for a community college in the proposed district, the need for the community college in the state, the financial ability of the proposed district to support a college, the educational soundness of the proposed community college plan and any other matters which might assist the commission in the disposition of the application. The county commissioners of the area within the proposed community college district shall reimburse the community college commission for all reasonable expenses incurred in making the survey. If the proposed district embraces more than one (1) county the costs of the survey shall be shared proportionately by the counties involved, according to population within the proposed district.

The commission shall approve or disapprove the petition within ninety (90) days of receipt thereof. The commission shall furnish the legislature a copy of its survey findings and recommendations and shall notify the county commissioners of the county wherein the proposed community college is to be located of its findings and recommendations.

After receipt of notice that a petition for establishment of a community college has been approved by the commission, the county clerk of the county wherein the proposed community college is to be located shall conduct an election to determine the question of creation of a community college district with authority to levy a tax not to exceed four (4) mills and to elect the initial members of the community college district board. The election shall be held on the next election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

which is not less than sixty (60) days after the receipt of the notice by the county clerk. In the event two (2) or more counties are to be included in the proposed community college district, the county commissioners shall proceed in accordance with W.S.

22-22-103

. The county clerk of the other county or counties involved shall conduct an election on that date as hereinafter provided. The county commissioners of the county or counties included within the proposed community college district shall pay all costs incident to the conduct of the election within their respective counties.

The county clerk of the county wherein the proposed community college is to be located shall publish at least one (1) notice of election in a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed community college district. The publication shall be made no more than thirty (30) days nor fewer than fifteen (15) days prior to the date set for the election. The notice shall state that the purpose of the election is to determine the question of creation of a community college district with authority to levy a tax not to exceed four (4) mills on the dollar of assessed valuation of property located within the proposed district and to elect members of the initial community college district board.

The county clerk, in conducting an election to determine the establishment of a community college district, has substantially the same duties and responsibilities as in the conduct of a regular college election except as otherwise provided.

Nominations to the initial community college district board are submitted on forms provided by the county clerk of the county wherein the proposed community college is to be located to be substantially the same as those required for the nomination of a candidate in a regular district board member election. All names so filed shall be printed in alphabetical order, without designation of party name or election subdistrict, on the ballot to be furnished the electors at each polling place on the day of the election by the county clerk of the county wherein the proposed community college is to be located. The names of all persons filing as candidates shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed community college district not later than the Saturday preceding the date of the election. Nothing in this section prevents a voter from writing the name of any qualified person on such ballot.

Absentee ballots are allowed in elections for the establishment of a community college district in the same manner as provided in the procedure for trustee elections.

Any person who qualifies as a voter in a community college district board election is entitled to vote in an election on the question of establishment of a community college district.

The question to be submitted to the voters to determine the establishment of a community college district shall be in substantially the following form:

“Shall a community college district be created and established according to law, encompassing . . . . . (name of the county or counties within the proposed community college district) to be known as . . . . . Community College District for the operation and maintenance of a community college to be located at . . . . . , Wyoming; and shall there be levied a special tax not to exceed four (4) mills on the dollar of taxable valuation within the district for the operation and maintenance of said community college?”

Community college and special mill tax
. . . . .
Yes •

Community college and special mill tax
. . . . .
No •

Immediately after the closing of the polls the election officers shall proceed to canvass the ballots. Results disclosed by the canvass shall be certified by the county clerk to the county commissioners of the county wherein the proposed community college is to be located. After all results have been received by the county commissioners of the county wherein the proposed community college is to be located the results shall immediately be certified to the commission.

The vote necessary to authorize the establishment of a community college district is a majority of all votes cast within the proposed community college district.

The county clerk shall prepare copies of the certification of election results and keep a copy of the certificate of election results on file.

If the election for establishment carries, the county clerk shall notify by registered mail the seven (7) candidates who receive the highest number of votes in the entire election. The seven (7) candidates shall constitute the initial board of the community college district. Terms of office shall begin on the day immediately following the certification of the election and shall expire at 12:00 noon on the first day in December following the first regular election of board members under W.S.

21-18-309

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 21-489; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-220; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-220

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, §§ 3, 4; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 73, § 1; 2022 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to conducting community college district elections, see §§

22-22-101

to

22-22-304

.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (r), substituted “county clerk” for “community college commission” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l), or paragraph (n)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

Posting of notice held not necessary. —

The legislature provided specifically for the method of annexation of a school district to an established community college district by means of an election and did not provide for any school district meeting as a requirement in the process, so notice by publication is all that is required, and posting is unnecessary. Reitveld v. Northern Wyo. Community College Dist., 344 P.2d 986 (Wyo. 1959). See now §

22-21-104

, requiring posting where there is no newspaper for publication.

Presumption is in favor of validity of election. —

Every reasonable presumption will be indulged in favor of the validity of a community college district annexation election, and the one asserting that the election is irregular must bear the burden of showing that it is otherwise. Reitveld v. Northern Wyo. Community College Dist., 344 P.2d 986,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1959).

And an election is not to be set aside for mere informalities or irregularities

unless they are shown to have affected the result of the election. Reitveld v. Northern Wyo. Community College Dist., 344 P.2d 986,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1959).

Commission's disapproval of county's application to form district was supported by substantial evidence

and was not arbitrary or capricious, where, although the expression of findings was deficient in some areas and the financial soundness criterion was partially unsupported, the record sufficiently demonstrated a balance of the applicable criteria. In re Campbell County, 731 P.2d 1174,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 388

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 21-18-313.
Bond issues; revenue bonds.

The community college district board of any community college having a daytime enrollment of at least two hundred (200) students may issue negotiable coupon bonds of the community college for the purpose of acquiring, erecting, and equipping student dormitories, dining halls, and recreational facilities, and acquiring sites therefor.

Except as otherwise provided bonds shall be payable solely out of a special fund to contain the net revenues to be derived from the operation of the dormitories, dining halls, and recreational facilities, the revenues being defined as those remaining after paying the cost of maintaining and operating the facilities. Bonds shall contain an irrevocable pledge of and lien on net revenues and are not general obligations of the districts issuing the bonds within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provisions, and the face of each bond issued shall so state. Bonds shall not be secured by mortgage on property but the net income on such property may be pledged for the payment of principal and interest thereon. The governing board of said community college district may, by resolution, pledge and pay into the special fund any or all of the revenue of the district, excluding the revenue derived from ad valorem taxes and student fees paid as tuition, and including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all other fees, rates, and charges in any manner derived from the operation of the college district to the extent necessary to provide for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds authorized to be issued.

Bonds shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by the community college district board, shall mature serially within a period not exceeding forty (40) years from their date and shall bear interest payable annually or semiannually. The resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds shall provide the details thereof, including provisions for their disposition, payment and redemption. The resolution shall provide for the accumulation of net revenue for a reserve fund of not less than seven percent (7%) of bond proceeds in addition to any amounts accumulated under subsection (e) of this section, for the maintenance and repair and for facility obsolescence and depreciation of any building or facility to be constructed or otherwise acquired through the bond issue, and it shall contain other or further covenants and agreements as may be determined by the governing board for the protection of bondholders.

Before issuing any revenue bonds, the governing board shall by resolution declare the purpose for which the proceeds of the bonds proposed to be issued shall be expended and shall specify the maximum amount of bonds to be issued or sold for that purpose. The governing board may not issue or sell bonds in an amount exceeding the specified maximum amount except with the consent of the bondholders and by amendment or modification of the indenture. The governing board may amend the resolution prior to the issuance of the bonds authorized thereby to increase or decrease the maximum amount of bonds to be issued or sold. The governing board may include in a single resolution or authorization the issuance of bonds for one (1) or more projects.

The governing board of a community college district shall establish and collect charges and rentals for services and facilities furnished, acquired, constructed, or purchased from the proceeds of the bonds, sufficient to pay the principal or the interest on the bonds as they become due and payable, together with such additional sums as may be deemed necessary for accumulating a reserve pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, providing for obsolescence and depreciation and paying the expenses of operating and maintaining the facilities. The governing board shall establish all other charges, fees and rates to be derived from the operation of the facilities.

The governing board of a community college district may insure against the loss of revenues from any cause. The proceeds of the insurance shall be used exclusively for the payment of bonds and the interest thereon. If loss of revenue is brought about as a result of the destruction of one (1) or more of the facilities constructed, acquired, or purchased from the proceeds of the bonds, then and in that event the proceeds of insurance may be used for the replacement of the facilities.

The governing board of a community college district may enter into agreements and contracts with the United States government and any of its agencies for the construction and operation of facilities and revenue bonds to be issued therefor. The governing board of the community college may comply with conditions that the federal government may impose to secure the full benefits of federal statutes pertaining to loans or grants to educational institutions for housing and other facilities, all other provisions of this act to the contrary notwithstanding.

Bonds issued pursuant to this act are eligible for investment by banking institutions and for estate, trust, and fiduciary funds, and the bonds and the interest thereon shall be exempt from taxation by this state and any subdivision thereof. The state treasurer of the state of Wyoming, with the approval of the governor and the attorney general, may invest any permanent state funds available for investment in the bonds to be issued hereunder.

The governing board of a community college district has plenary powers and responsibility for the acquisition, construction, and completion of all projects authorized by the governing board by the resolution to issue revenue bonds.

The governing board of a community college district may insure such facilities authorized by the governing board against public liability or property damage.

The governing board may provide for the replacement of destroyed, lost, or mutilated bonds or coupons.

All costs and expenses incident to the issuance and sale of the revenue bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds. Interest on bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds during the actual construction of any facilities for which the bonds were issued. Provision for the payment of interest under such circumstances shall be made in the indenture.

Revenue bonds may be sold at either public or private sale. The community college district board may establish terms and conditions for the sale or other disposition of an authorized issue of bonds. The board may authorize, by resolution, the sale of bonds at less than their par or face value.

The governing board may provide for the execution and authentication of revenue bonds by the manual, lithographed, or printed facsimile signature of officers of the governing board of the community college district if at least one (1) signature shall be manually inscribed.

Revenue bonds are callable upon such terms, conditions, and notice as the governing board may determine and upon the payment of such premium as may be fixed by the board in the proceedings for the issuance of the bonds. No bond is subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless the right to exercise the call is expressly stated on the face of the bond.

The community college district board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds issued under the provisions authorizing the board to issue revenue bonds. All provisions of this act applicable to the issuance of revenue bonds by community college districts are applicable to the funding or refunding of revenue bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange thereof.

The governing board of a community college district may issue funding or refunding bonds in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds funded or refunded thereby, and in addition for the payment of all expenses incident to the calling, retiring, or paying of the outstanding bonds, and the issuance of the funding or refunding bonds.

Any balance remaining in any fund established to pay the principal and interest on bonds after payment of all charges, costs and expenses authorized to be expended therefrom may be allocated and used for the acquisition, construction, equipping, and furnishing of buildings and sites for community college purposes.

The obligation and liability of the community college district board, severally and individually, to the holders of the bonds is limited to applying proceeds of the special fund to the payment of principal and interest on the bonds and the bonds shall contain a provision to that effect. In the event of default in the payment of bonds or the interest thereon, and in the event that the board is misusing special funds or not using them as provided by this act, then the holders, or any of them, may bring suit against the board in the district court of the county wherein the community college is located for the purpose of restraining the board from using the funds for any purpose other than the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds as provided by this act.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 21-490; Laws 1971, ch. 254, §§ 18, 19; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-221; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-221

; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1997, ch. 17, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

§ 21-18-314.
Bond issues; general obligation bonds; bond elections; bond tax levy.

A majority of the community college district board may submit to the electors of the district the question of whether the board shall issue bonds of the district not to exceed four percent (4%) of the assessed valuation of the community college district:

For the purchase, erection, remodeling, or completion of a building or buildings for community college purposes and the equipment and suitable site therefor;

For the purchase of equipment and facilities, including laboratories, libraries, and other such facilities as may be deemed necessary and proper for the college;

For fees and costs attendant to the services of attorneys, architects, and engineers, and for the cost of publications, the printing of bonds and prospectus.

Bonds may run for a period of twenty-five (25) years or less and bear interest. In addition, not less than seven percent (7%) of the bond proceeds shall be used for the maintenance and repair and for facility obsolescence and depreciation of any building or facility to be constructed or otherwise acquired through the bond issue. The four percent (4%) limitation in subsection (a) of this section shall be separate and apart from and in addition to the ten percent (10%) limitation of indebtedness as provided for by the constitution and laws of Wyoming for school districts. The levy for payment thereof is separate and apart from and in addition to the operating levy of not to exceed four (4) mills, and additional levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-303(b) and any additional operating levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-311(f) of not to exceed five (5) mills, unless the bond election question provides otherwise.

An election on the question of the issuance of bonds by a community college district shall be held on the dates and in the manner prescribed in the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

If the proposed issue of bonds is approved in the election and issuance thereof is authorized by the community college district board the bonds may be sold at either public or private sale. All costs and expenses incident to the issue and sale of the bonds made may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds. If the bonds are sold at public sale the community college district board must give at least one (1) notice by publication in some newspaper of general circulation in the community college district, and also in some newspaper published in the capital of this state, of its intention to sell the bonds, briefly describing same, and the time and place where the sale will take place. The publication shall be made not less than fifteen (15) days, nor more than thirty (30) days prior to the date designated for the sale of the bonds.

After ascertaining the best terms upon, and the lowest interest at which the bonds can be sold, the community college district board shall cause the bonds to be suitably printed or lithographed, with coupons, if any, attached, and thereafter shall have the bonds consecutively numbered and otherwise properly prepared and executed. Bonds may be in such form as the board may direct but must bear the signature of the president of the community college board of trustees, be countersigned by the secretary of the board, bear the district seal and be countersigned by the county treasurer. Bond coupons, if any, must be signed by the president and secretary of the board and by the county treasurer. The secretary of the community college board shall endorse a certificate upon every bond that it is issued pursuant to law and is within the debt limit of the issuer. Bonds shall be registered by the county treasurer in a public book provided for that purpose stating the number, date, amount, time and place of payment, rate of interest, number of coupons attached, if any, for each bond so entered and any other proper description thereof for future identification.

Bonds issued by community college districts pursuant to this section shall bear interest payable annually or semiannually, and evidenced by one (1) or two (2) sets of coupons, if any, except that the first coupon may evidence interest for a period not in excess of one (1) year, and the bonds may be in one (1) or more series, may bear a date or dates, may mature in an amount or amounts, serially or otherwise, at a time or times not exceeding twenty-five (25) years from their respective dates, may be in a denomination or denominations, may be payable in a medium of payment, in a place or places, within or without the state, including, but not limited to the office of the county treasurer of the county in which the college is located, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to terms or prior redemption in advance of maturity in order, or by lot, or otherwise, at a time or times with or without premium, may bear privileges for reissuance in the same or other denominations, may be so reissued without modification of maturities and interest rates and may be in a form, either coupon or registered, as may be provided by resolution of the community college district board. Except as the board may otherwise provide, bonds and interest coupons attached thereto, if any, are fully negotiable, within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, W.S. 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603. A holder of each bond, by accepting the bond, shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that the bond is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, W.S. 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603.

Whenever the issuance of bonds by a community college district may be lawful, the community college district board having authority to issue said bonds may, at its discretion, divide such issues into series so that substantially equal amounts of the indebtedness shall mature annually, or so that substantially equal tax levies shall be required for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds, or that substantially equal tax payments shall be required for the payment of principal and interest of all outstanding bonds of the district issuing said bonds, the bonds of each such series being made due and payable at a definite date within the period permitted by law for the discharge of such indebtedness.

The sale of bonds must be conducted by the community college district board. All proceeds from the sale of bonds shall be paid to the treasury of the county in which the college is located to the credit of the community college district and shall be made immediately available to the community college district upon order of the community college district board. Bonds shall not be sold for less than par value, and the board is authorized to reject any bids. The faith, credit, and all property lying within the community college district are solemnly pledged for the payment of the interest and the redemption of the principal of all bonds issued pursuant to this section.

The board of county commissioners shall cause to be levied annually upon all taxable property of the community college district, in addition to other authorized taxes, a sufficient sum to pay the principal and interest on bonds as the payments thereon become due to be levied, assessed, and collected in the same manner as other taxes for school purposes. The tax shall be known as “District bond tax of . . . . . Community College District” and shall be levied until the principal and interest of the bonds are fully paid. If the tax for the payment of interest on any bonds issued under this act at any time is not levied or collected in time to meet payment, the interest shall be paid out of any monies in the general fund of the district and the monies so used for payment shall be repaid to the fund from which taken out of the first monies collected from district taxes.

The county treasurer shall pay out of any monies belonging to the community college district tax fund, the interest upon any bonds issued under this section by the college district when due upon presentation at his office of the proper coupon, which must show the amount due, and the number of the bond to which it belonged. All coupons paid must be reported to the community college district board at its meeting thereafter.

If any member of the community college district board fraudulently fails or refuses to pay into the proper county treasury the money arising from the sale of any bonds provided for by this act, he is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for a term of not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years.

The community college district board shall require the county treasurer to give the district a separate bond in such sum as the board deems proper, with two (2) or more sufficient sureties, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties required of him by this section and the faithful accounting for the monies deposited with him and realized from the sale of said bonds, as herein provided for. Bonds shall be approved by the board and shall be and remain in the custody of the district board.

The bonds and any coupons bearing the signatures of the officers in office at the time of the signing thereof are valid and binding obligations of the community college district board, notwithstanding that before delivery or payment thereof, any or all of the persons whose signatures or facsimiles appear thereon have ceased to fill their respective offices.

Any officer of the board authorized or permitted to sign any bonds, including revenue bonds, refunding bonds, and bonds specified in this section, or interest coupons at the time of its execution, upon the execution and filing of a signature certificate, may execute or cause to be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature any bonds and coupons, if any, issued pursuant to the provisions of this act and may adopt as and for his own signature the facsimile signature of his predecessor in office in the event that the facsimile signature, having been executed by an officer then authorized to do so, appears upon the bonds or coupons. When the seal of the district is required in the execution of a bond or instrument of payment, the secretary of the community college district board may cause the seal to be imprinted, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 21-491; Laws 1971, ch. 240, § 10; ch. 254, §§ 20 to 22; 1975, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 102, § 1; 1977, ch. 25, § 1; ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-222; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-222; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 1990, ch. 40, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1997, ch. 17, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “34.1-8-603” for “34.1-8-408” in two places in (f).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

The article on investment securities in the Uniform Commercial Code, referred to in subsection (f) as W.S. 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-408, has been amended to include §§ 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603.

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (j), (m) and (p), see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Community college debt limitation is separate from school district limitation. —

The legislature has expressly and unequivocally provided that the debt limitation authorized for community college districts shall be separate and apart from the limitation prescribed for school districts. Kelly v. Nelson, 184 Kan. 803, 339 P.2d 64, 1959 Kan. LEXIS 349 (Kan. 1959).

And such additional limitation is constitutional. —

The legislature having expressly provided for the establishment of community colleges and community college districts as something apart from and in addition to existing school districts, and there being no constitutional restriction to prevent the legislature from so doing, this section is constitutional, insofar as it allows a community college district to incur an indebtedness of 2% (now 4%) of its assessed valuation separate and apart from the 10% limitation of indebtedness for school districts, as provided in art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const.Goshen County Community College Dist. v. School Dist., 399 P.2d 64,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 21-18-315.
Bond issues; refunding.

Any bonds issued by any community college district may be refunded, without an election, by the district which issued the bonds, in the name of the district, but subject to the provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise appertaining thereto, for any of the following purposes:

To extend the maturities of outstanding bonds for which payment is in arrears, or which there is not, or it is certain that there will not be, sufficient money to pay the principal or interest on outstanding bonds as due;

To reduce interest costs or effecting other economies;

To reorganize all or any part of the outstanding bonds of the district in order to equalize tax levies;

To refund any bonds which were issued payable from a limited mill levy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 21-492; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-223; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-223; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to refunding revenue bonds, see § 21-18-313(r) and (s).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-18-316.
Liberal construction.

This act being necessary to secure public health, safety, convenience, and welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 21-493; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-224; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-224; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

Severability. —

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 24 provides: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the act are declared to be severable.”

§ 21-18-317.
Authority to provide educational program; scope and approval of program.

The community college district board of any community college in this state may provide an educational program in the field of nursing. The educational program shall be of the duration and intensity as may be deemed appropriate by the community college district board and the Wyoming state board of nursing and shall lead to an associate degree in nursing and prepare each student for licensure as provided by law. Approval of the Wyoming state board of nursing is required prior to the establishment of the nursing education.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 145, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-494; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-3-301

; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-301

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming investment in nursing (WYIN) program, see §

9-2-123

.

21-18-318.
Student electronic writings and other electronic communications; expectation of privacy.

No ownership rights to any electronic writing or other electronic communication created by a student shall be conveyed, transferred or otherwise affected solely as a result of the writing or other communication being stored on an electronic device paid for in whole or in part by a community college within the state or transmitted or stored on a community college’s network.

Students at a community college in the state shall have an expectation of privacy in the electronic writings and other electronic communications created by the student regardless of whether the writing or other communication is stored on an electronic device paid for in whole or in part by the community college or transmitted or stored on the community college’s network. A community college shall not require a student to waive or limit the student’s expectation of privacy specified under this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to writings or other communications:

Publicly disclosed, released or conveyed by the student or otherwise made available for observation by the student in such a manner that a person would not reasonably expect the writing or other communication would remain undisclosed to others;

Accessed by a community college in cases where there is a technological requirement to support and maintain the community college’s electronic device or network. Writings or other communications viewed during the technological support or maintenance of the electronic device or network shall be limited to only those writings or other communications required to address the specific technical issue and shall not be used or distributed to any other person or entity unless otherwise mandated by federal or state law.

The property rights and expectation of privacy provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to a writing or other communication created by a student who is simultaneously employed by and enrolled at a community college if the writing or other communication is created when the person is acting in an official capacity as an employee of the community college. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to diminish the property rights or expectation of privacy of persons acting in the capacity of an employee of a community college.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Impose, by operation of law, or require a community college to accept or prohibit a community college from accepting any liability or responsibility for collecting, maintaining, storing or otherwise recording writings and other communications created by a student;

Require a community college to establish or prohibit a community college from establishing standards on the retention and destruction of student writings and other communications.

For purposes of this section, “student” means any person currently enrolled full time or part time at a community college in the state.

History.

2017 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 36, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.